Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 1. Custodians of State Funds.

Sec. 37.10.010.
Disbursements.

The Department of Administration shall

disburse money only upon vouchers certified by the department, establishment, or agency concerned, or an officer or employee of it authorized in writing to certify the vouchers;

make an examination of vouchers necessary to ascertain whether they are in proper form, certified and approved, computed on the basis of the facts certified; and

be held accountable accordingly.

History.

(§ 12-3-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 37.10.020.
Vouchers to be approved by administrative officer.

A voucher arising from the conduct of an office or administration of the state shall be approved by the administrative officer before reference to the Department of Administration for payment.

History.

(§ 12-3-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 37.10.030.
Responsibility of officer or employee approving or certifying voucher.

The officer or employee approving or certifying a voucher

is responsible for the existence and correctness of the facts recited in the certificate or stated on the voucher or its supporting papers and for the legality of the proposed payment under the appropriation or fund involved;

shall give bond in the form and manner prescribed by AS 39.15 to the state, and approved by the Department of Administration, in an amount fixed by the head of the department, agency, or establishment concerned, under standards prescribed by the Department of Administration; the premium on the bond shall be paid from funds made available for the administrative costs of the department, agency, or establishment concerned; officers already bonded under other provisions of law for the faithful performance of their duties are not required to give additional bond; and

shall be held accountable for and required to make good to the state the amount of an illegal, improper, or incorrect payment resulting from a false, inaccurate, or misleading certificate made by the officer or employee, or a payment prohibited by law or which does not represent a legal obligation under the appropriation or fund involved.

In (a) of this section, an approval or certification of a voucher is effective when an authorized person uses a password assigned by the department if the certification or the voucher itself is prepared and recorded by using an electronic accounting device that is a part of the computerized state accounting systems.

History.

(§ 12-3-3 ACLA 1949; am § 38 ch 133 SLA 1951; am §§ 1, 2 ch 24 SLA 1953; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 1985)

Sec. 37.10.040.
Enforcement of liability.

The liability of a certifying officer or employee is enforced in the same manner as provided by law with respect to enforcement of the liability of a disbursing and other accountable officer.

History.

(§ 12-3-4 ACLA 1949)